Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Central State Hospital Recovery Authority

56.600.
Central State Hospital Recovery Authority — Board. [Repealed.]

56.601.
Powers of board. [Repealed.]

56.602.
Attachment of authority to Finance and Administration Cabinet. [Repealed.]

56.603.
Expiration of KRS 56.600 to 56.602 and abolition of authority. [Repealed.]